enhuadj2.foma
define HarmRuleJJ  §J§ -> j || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJJ1  §JJ§ -> j || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJnull §J§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJnull1 §Jnull§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJmagas §Jmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowel | ConsJaje | Cons y ] FirstHat ?* _ .o. 
         §Jmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §Jmagas§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* [ ConsAeJaje | ConsAe | Vowel y ] FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuletol §oooe§ -> ó // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oooe§ -> ő // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuletolmagas §oooemagas§ -> ő // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oooemagas§ -> ő // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuletolmely §oooe2§ -> ó // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oooe2§ -> ó // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleul §uue§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §uue§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleulmagas §uuemagas§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §uuemagas§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleulmely §uue2§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §uue2§ -> u // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAA §AAA§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
          §AAA§ -> é // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAAmagas §AAAmagas§ -> é // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
          §AAAmagas§ -> é // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAAmely §AAA2§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
          §AAA2§ -> á // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAA §AA§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §AA§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAmely §AA2§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §AA2§ -> a // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAmagas §AAmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §AAmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleVVy §VVy§ -> v || Vowelwithyy FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> b || \b b FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> c || \c c FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> d || \d d FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> f || \f f FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> g || \g g FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> h || [ \h & \c ] h FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> j || \j j FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> k || \k k FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> l || \l l FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> m || \m m FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> n || \n n FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> p || \p p FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> q || \q q FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> r || \r r FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> s || [ \s & \c & \t & \z ] s FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> t || \t t FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> v || \v v FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> w || \w w FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> s z || \x x FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> 0 || [ b b | c c | d d | f f | g g | h h | j j | k k | l l | m m | n n | p p | q q | r r | s s | t t | v v | w w | x x | y y | z z ] FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVy§ -> [ c s ] || [ Vowel t s | i c h | t s c h | ć | č ] FirstHat _ .o. # Damjanich Bartsch
         §VVy§ -> [ h ] || [ [ o | a | u | r | l | e ]  c h ] FirstHat _ .o. # Bloch Bach eunuch Karch Pilch
         §VVy§ -> s || [ s c h ] FirstHat _ .o. # Damjanich Bartsch
         §VVy§ -> 0 || [ c c s | g g y | l l y | n n y | t t y | s s z | z z s ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \g g y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \l l y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \n n y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \t t y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \c c s FirstHat _ .o. # css-> ccs
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \s s z FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> %$ || \z z s FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> s || \s s FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> v || \y y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> z || [ \c & \z & \t ] z FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVy§ -> c || [ t z | c z ] FirstHat _ .o. # tz-> tzc
         y -> g || g _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         y -> l || l _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         y -> n || n _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> y || [ g g | l l | n n ] FirstHat _ .o.
         y -> t || t _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> y || t t FirstHat _ .o.
         s -> c || c _ FirstHat %$ .o. # cs$ -> cc$
         %$ -> s || c c FirstHat _ .o.  # cc$ -> ccs
         z -> s || s _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> z || s s FirstHat _ .o.
         s -> z || z _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> s || z z FirstHat _ ;
define HarmRuleVVmagas §VVmagas§ -> v || Vowel FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> b || \b b FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> c || \c c FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> d || \d d FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> f || \f f FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> g || \g g FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> h || [ \h & \c ] h FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> j || \j j FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> k || \k k FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> l || \l l FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> m || \m m FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> n || \n n FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> p || \p p FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> q || \q q FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> r || \r r FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> s || [ \s & \c & \t & \z ] s FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> t || \t t FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> v || \v v FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> w || \w w FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> j || Vowel y FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> s z || \x x FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> 0 || [ b b | c c | d d | f f | g g | h h | j j | k k | l l | m m | n n | p p | q q | r r | s s | t t | v v | w w | x x | y y | z z ] FirstHat _ ,,
         §VVmagas§ -> [ c s ] || [ Vowel t s | i c h | t s c h | ć | č ] FirstHat _ .o. # Damjanich Bartsch
         §VVmagas§ -> [ h ] || [ [ o | a | u | r | l | e ]  c h ] FirstHat _ .o. # Bloch Bach eunuch Karch Pilch
         §VVmagas§ -> s || [ s c h ] FirstHat _ .o. # Damjanich Bartsch
         §VVmagas§ -> 0 || [ c c s | g g y | l l y | n n y | t t y | s s z | z z s ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \g g y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \l l y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \n n y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \t t y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \c c s FirstHat _ .o. # css-> ccs
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \s s z FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> %$ || \z z s FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> s || \s s FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> v || \y y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> z || [ \c & \z & \t ] z FirstHat _ .o.
         §VVmagas§ -> c || [ t z | c z ] FirstHat _ .o. # tz-> tzc
         y -> g || g _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         y -> l || l _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         y -> n || n _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> y || [ g g | l l | n n ] FirstHat _ .o.
         y -> t || t _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> y || t t FirstHat _ .o.
         s -> c || c _ FirstHat %$ .o. # cs$ -> cc$
         %$ -> s || c c FirstHat _ .o.  # cc$ -> ccs
         z -> s || s _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> z || s s FirstHat _ .o.
         s -> z || z _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> s || z z FirstHat _ ;
define HarmRuleVV §VV§ -> v || Vowel FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> b || \b b FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> c || \c c FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> d || \d d FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> f || \f f FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> g || \g g FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> h || [ \h & \c ] h FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> j || \j j FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> k || \k k FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> l || \l l FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> m || \m m FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> n || \n n FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> p || \p p FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> q || \q q FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> r || \r r FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> s || [ \s & \c & \t & \z ] s FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> t || \t t FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> v || \v v FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> w || \w w FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> s z || \x x FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> 0 || [ b b | c c | d d | f f | g g | h h | j j | k k | l l | m m | n n | p p | q q | r r | s s | t t | v v | w w | x x | y y | z z ] FirstHat _ ,,
         §VV§ -> [ c s ] || [ Vowel t s | i c h | t s c h | ć | č ] FirstHat _ .o. # Damjanich Bartsch
         §VV§ -> s || [ s c h ] FirstHat _ .o. # Damjanich Bartsch
         §VV§ -> [ h ] || [ [ o | a | u | r | e | l ]  c h ] FirstHat _ .o. # Bloch Bach eunuch Karch Pilch
         §VV§ -> 0 || [ c c s | g g y | l l y | n n y | t t y | s s z | z z s ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> %$ || \g g y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> %$ || \l l y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> %$ || \n n y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> %$ || \t t y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> %$ || \c c s FirstHat _ .o. # css-> ccs
         §VV§ -> %$ || \s s z FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> %$ || \z z s FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> s || \s s FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> v || \y y FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> z || [ \c & \z & \t ] z FirstHat _ .o.
         §VV§ -> c || [ t z | c z ] FirstHat _ .o. # tz-> tzc
         y -> g || g _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         y -> l || l _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         y -> n || n _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> y || [ g g | l l | n n ] FirstHat _ .o.
         y -> t || t _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> y || t t FirstHat _ .o.
         s -> c || c _ FirstHat %$ .o. # cs$ -> cc$
         %$ -> s || c c FirstHat _ .o.  # cc$ -> ccs
         z -> s || s _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> z || s s FirstHat _ .o.
         s -> z || z _ FirstHat %$ .o.
         %$ -> s || z z FirstHat _ ;
# falukéhoz falvakéhoz
define HarmRulehoz §oeoe§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoe§ -> e // Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ,,
         §oeoe§ -> ö // Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ;
define HarmRulehozoe §oeoeoe§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoeoe§ -> e // Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ,,
         §oeoeoe§ -> e // Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ;
define HarmRulehozy §oeoey§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoey§ -> e // Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ,,
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
         §oeoey§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ .o.
         §oeoey§ -> e // Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ; 
define HarmRulehozyy §oeoeyy§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Vowel | y ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoeyy§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoeyy§ -> e // [ Front1UnroundedVowel | y ] \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ,,
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
         §oeoeyy§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* %^ ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ .o.
         §oeoeyy§ -> e // [ Front1RoundedVowel | y ] \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ; 
define HarmRulehozmely §oeoe2§ -> o // .#. ?* FirstHat ?* _ ;
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
define HarmRulehozmagas §oeoemagas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FirstHat ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ .o.
         §oeoemagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoemagas§ -> e // Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ,,
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
         §oeoemagas§ -> e // Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat \"^"* _ ; 
define HarmRuleonen §oeoez§ -> 0 //  Vowelwithy FirstHat* _ .o.
# rácsaimen
         §oeoez§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* FirstHat ?* _ .o.
# mécsünken
